#NOTES

Reptilian Creation~
Sskiltee~
The creature's tracks were clearly perceptible in the soft mud under the

beating rain.  A foreseeing drove the creature into the raging storm,

moving blindly to an indefinite location.  It neared the edge of a

subterranean swamp, located deep within the forested lands.  Closer and

closer, the creature began to make out the figure of an offspring, too

large to be human.  Suddenly a flash of lightning broke out, bright

enough for the creature to easily negotiate the remaining distance

between it and the offspring.  Looking into the face of the newborn, the

creature was delighted.


Never had it seen another of its kind after the Great War.  The

serpentman race was demolished along with most of its cousins, the

lizardmen.  The creature removed its robe, wrapped the newborn lizardman,

and ran back to its wretched hut.  Never mating with another of its kind,

the creature was completely ignorant of how to handle newborns.  So, it

fed the tiny lizardman the food it ate, meat.  Surprisingly, the little

lizardman accepted the meat, a food from here on dominating its diet.


The elder lizardman, becoming the father of the little one, raised the

lizardman, one he treated and loved as if he was his own.  The little

lizardman was named Sskiltee.  Sskiltee aquired the name from his father,

a lizardman by the name of Sskiltae.  Sskiltae had fought in the Great

War with his brothers and cousins.  He was a follower of Serpent God

Lanokota and a monk in Lanokota's Holy Order.  Sskiltae and few others

had barely escaped the devasating war, in the hope of preserving the

reptilian race.  In their panic, the lizard brothers got separated from

each other and spread into unknown forests.  From that moment on,

Sskiltae had been living alone, hoping to see any of his race again.


Fortunately, Sskiltae had not forgotten the way of the monk.  His

knowledge was passed on to Sskiltee, his prosperous, eager apprentice. 

One day, a band of lost goblins happened to pass by Sskiltae's hut.  They

approached and decided to find out what inhabited this strange land. 

Sskiltae, having had no visitors since he settled in the forest, was of

course suspicious at the loud knock on the door.  Sskiltae summoned his

son and told him to hide in an underground, hidden cellar.  Sskiltee

started to protest, but Sskiltae assured him that he would be alright

himself.  Sskiltae peered through a crack in the wall and glimpsed a

sight of four goblins.


Sskiltae instantly understood that these goblins, a dire rival of his

race, were not here to socialize.  He immediately clad himself in his

light suit of leather armor, the same one he used in the Great War.  He

focused his energy in his claws and prepared to battle.  He flung the

door open and switched his stance to that of battle.  It did not take

long for the goblins to realize that he was a lizrdman, and all four of

them attacked at once.  The attempt to overwhelm him at the start of the

fight was not successful.  Being a competent and experienced fighter, he

dodged the first goblin's attack, tripped the second one, sending him

flying into the hut, and moved back from the other two approaching

goblins.  He quickly ripped the fallen goblin's guts out before he could

get up and turned to face the remaining three.  Having seen their comrade

brutally executed, they decided to use tact.  Sskiltae had intelligently

pushed himself back into a corner, making it easier for him to fight more

than one foe.  Two goblins advanced, while one stood back, Sskiltae

deducing him to be their leader.  Sskiltae feigned attack on one of the

goblins and caused him to shift his weight to one side.  Not fast enough

to balance himself once more, the goblin was easily killed by a fatal

blow to the kidney.  Sskiltae was just about to advance on the third

goblin when the hidden door to the cellar close to him was flung open,

striking him in the legs.  Sskiltae lost his balance and found a sword

driving into his abdomen.  Sskiltee poked his head out of the cellar only

to see the bloody corpse of his father with the sword still embedded in

his flesh.  Turning his head, Sskiltee saw two goblins grinning evilly as

they advanced towards him...


To be continued...

~
896225957
Muvur usda coock~
Kawainui~
Myye muvur waz a gud cok . Sse cud cook da best phish and potatatos pie! 

Firsst sse whuld go ana cetchs a big swamp phish.  Sse wud sliceim and

diceim reel gud . Deh sse go ana pik dah beess pottaaataos ana chopim up

reel gud.  Den sse whud go adn find dah beesst errbs and spiches sse cud

find inda WOLE worlds.  Den she vud putt it ona big fira and lets et

coock for wile.  Den it waz reel gud 

Kawaianuis no speelim gud toknite

~
896230469
The not so shaggy shaggy dog story.~
Jaime~
One day Bill and his dog Nate where walking through a secure town.The

town had a mechanical wall, that would drop down to let someone in, then

come up to stop invaders.Anyway, Bill was approached by the town security

officials."Bill, we have watched you.You are a great fighter.We need you

to guard the tower that has the lever that controls the wall."says the

official."We will pay you well." So, bill decided to take the job.When he

entered the tower, he saw the lever.  This is the towns defense.He must

defend it.After three years of uneventful guarding the tower, a group of

invaders attacked the town.All the guards were butchered, and only four

of the advance scout made it to Bill.The first one whipped out a

sword.Bill disarmed him with a judo kick, took his sword, and quickly

removed his head.At the same time, Nate, his dog, jumped after the

biggest guy.The Biggest Invader caught Nate threw him down, and broke his

back legs.  Bill, having concern for his own life, saw the another man

whip out a crossbow.He cleaved him in two, grabbed his crossbow, and shot

the third invader in the chest, killing him.While all this was happening,

Nate jumped on The Big Invaders throat, and grabbed a big chunk without

letting go.  the Big Invader grabbed Nate, and ripped him from his

throat, and broke his neck But, when he removed Nate from his throat, he

removed what was left of his throat.All the invaders were dead, the lever

never moved.Bill surveyed the damage, and thought to himself

Better Nate than Lever.

stories

~
896459443
The Ranger~
Kira~
@yKira sat next to the Old Forest Road, just being her normal ranger self

and thinking.  A refreshing, gentle breeze blew by and eased her mind. 

She began to think of her past, what had made her what she is today.  She

even began to think of where the ranger came from.  Just then she

remembered a story her father had told her when she was a little

girl...@n 


Long ago a young woman lived near The Forest's Edge.  This woman enjoyed

the outdoors and the beauty the lands could offer.  Often, she would

wonder the area just to marvel at it's beauty.


One such day, the woman made her way onto the Old Forest Road.  She

stayed far from the west side, so to aviod the vines, but a mound of

brambles snagged her foot and began to pull her in.  She tried to get

free, but it was a useless struggle.  When it looked as if all hope would

be lost, the woman prayed to Cynnis that she might protect her.  Just

then, the brambles let go.  The woman was scratched and battered, but at

least she was alive.


She glanced around to see what had caused the brambles to retreat.  She

turned around only to see a grey wolf, her eyes staring at the young

woman's.  Then the wolf transformed before her eyes into a beautiful,

green-eyed elf.


"Who, who are you?" the girl spoke fearfully.


"I am Cynnis, goddess of the woods and forest whom you prayed to." the

elf replied.


"Oh, thank you for answering me.  I owe you my life!  What could I ever

do to repay you?" 


"Go out and be faithful to my children.  Protect the forest and those in

it that they may prosper.  The call of the ranger is no easy task. 

Sacrifices are to be made, and your place to fit into civilization is

small.  Yet the reward is many talents, and friends who are always ready

to be called upon for aid." Having said these things, Cynnis left, never

to be seen by the woman again.


@yAnd that is the story of the first ranger...@n

~
896459824
Bluddy story~
Mergan~
Long ago, before great dark age, dere waz a fearsome troll.  Hiz name waz

BLUDD.  He waz a scourge to all surface-dwellers.  He telled me a few

stories before he left dis land, me will share wit you now.


First me tell you about girl and her wolfy, Waz a good day for hunting,

cold and rainy.  Bludd waz on hiz way to haunted mansion, looking for

fresh meat.  But when he seez a little girl sleeping next to her little

wolfy, He had to stop for a little snack.  Sitting and looking at diz

girl , she seemed more powerful den here little body said.  Bludd always

considered how powerful hiz preyz were, not liking da taste of newborns. 

Dis girl , she seemed promising.  Alongside here waz her wolfy, sleeping

quiet-like, waiting to die.  Bludd coiled likez a snake and prepared to

pounce on da little girly.  He waitsez till she exhales, soze she can't

scream too much(no breath).  Den........  He plunges hiz magiked dagger

into her soft skinsez.  Da second hiz dagger slipped though her skinsez,

she woke screaming, wide-eyed wit terror.  Never waz der a more beautiful

sight!  She fleed and fleed fast...running all da way to Chiiron before

Bludd could catch her.  He waz sorry she was so fast, but dere waz still

the doggy.  Poor doggy, master left him, still sleeping like human baby

pie.  But No worry, Bludd wanted to return lost doggy to da little girly. 

Wit da same patience and skill he waitsez for puppy to be ready to die. 

Wit one mighty blow, Bludd cut off little puppies head, letting brain

juice spill for Morkith.  Den he picks up doggy body and takes it to da

gate of Chiiron.  He yelled to girly dat here doggy waz waiting outside

for here to come save him, den he left.  He disappeared into shadows once

more, looking for more little meatsez.


BAAAaaaaHAHAHAHAHAHhahahahah!!!!!!!  Always makez me happy when I hears a

good story.

~
896536984
Goblins~
Rumblebuffin~
A goblin's ears are very long,

A goblin's nose goes wobble,

But what I'd reallly like to know

Is what makes goblins gobble?


Perhaps they gobble 'cause they're imps-

And dreadfully imp-olite!

Pshaw, all they do is squabble hobble,

Gobble through the night!

(from The Cowardly Lion of Oz, by Ruth Plumy Thompson)

~
896556287
The End~
Kira~
Kira and Sionell stood deep in a clearing in the woods of Medienne.  The

air was thick and humid.  Early morning haze made it hard to see very far.


Kira knew this was it.  She gave Sionell a hug and the two stood,

embraced for a long time.  Kira's backpack was loaded with the supplies

she could not make herself, or find on her journey.


"Well, I guess this is it." Kira said.  "Whatever awaits me beyond here

is unknown to any other mortal and is mine to enjoy." 


"Are you sure you want to do this?" Sionell asked.


"Yes.  Cynnis has merely given to me a sliver of what is beyond, and i

crave to find the rest of it.  Goodbye my friend." 


"Goodbye." Sionell replied.


With that, Kira walked off into the mist, never to be heard of or seen

from again.  What she found, if she found it, is unknown to all.  Maybe,

someday, it will be revealed.  There was a rumor, not to long ago, that a

citizen of Medienne has seen a slender figure with long black hair

walking through the forest, hidden by a mist.


Over time, she was forgotten by most, but was always be remembered by

those who knew her well.  It was rumored that her family name was even

taken by a close friend who couldn't let it die.


@yIn memory of Kira Hailan, Dark Ranger, Shuvanaguard, Tower of

Knowledge, Watchers of the Changing Winds, Disciples of the Dragon's

Eye, and a true ranger all the way.@n

~
896583937
Pulchit and Morr~
Pulchit~
Me hads a brother, hises names be Pulchit too.  Me wasn'ts born when me

brother died, so mes parents named me Pulchit too.  Dey too dumb to think

of nother name.  Me brother was smarter, for trollses.  He runs fast into

nasty zone and runses out again too fast for mobses to hits him.  Me

brudder tink he too smarts tho.  He hire little chotic evills to kills

people and takeses der schtuff.  Ol brudder would lie and cheat and do

eeevil stuff dat made godses angry.  One day godses had enuf.  Morr came

out from Ghenna (in the form of Orb) and smote me brudder down in mighty

wrath.

"PULCHIT!" Thundered Morr (who looked ever so spritely!), "You have

disgraced your existence!" Me brudder looked at Morr with a dumb

expression.  "I've what my what?!" He says.  Morr looked down at me

brudder and sighed mightily.  "For your stupendously stupid and malignant

crimes, Pulchit, you are sentenced to oblivion." So Morr blows me brudder

into many itty bits and the wormses and grueses eats him up.

--------------------

So, mes mudder and padder makeses me.  Dey dim as dark night so dey name

me after me brudder.  When me make me boy-man year me has horrid day. 

Morr come to ME and say, "PULCHIT!!!  I condemmed you to oblivion and you

defy me!" Mes grovell to morr and snivelses and say no no dat wuz me

brudder dont hurt me head big bad godtype being . 

Morr no killses me though, he speak instead!

Morr says to me, "You shall be my disciple, Pulchit.  You will perform

this task for me: Kill every single living being in this land and

sacrifice its corpse upon my altar to my glory.  " 

Me sayses, with face ground in da dirt, how me kill everyting?  Meses

wont live dat long!" 

Morr thunders, "SILENCE!  You will do what I demand or share your

brother's fate, sniveling worm!" And great angry god vanishes from sight. 

So deres me story.  Mes gots to kill every thing mes sees and sacrifice

it to Morr.

~
896663983
Eagle Eye~
Raltin~
Early on this clear blue day, I saw the sun rise over the valley from the

Eagle Eye Bridge.  The landscape took my breathe away, and I could see

all the lands I had grew up in.  Oh how I loved the lands, and the

descent folk in them.

It was in this awe, that a stranger had come into my midst on the bridge. 

Clean, and well dressed, I had never came accross this person in all my

travels.  Realizing they must be new to the area, I invited them into my

company, and went back to the Eagle Eye Cafe where I bought the man some

coffee from Ruoger.  Not any sooner had i bought the coffee, there was an

uprising in the cafe.

A thief, hiding in the corner, jumped from the saddows and backstabbed

Ruoger.  Taking his money, the thief fleed from the cafe through the

green swinging doors before anyone could get up.

Seeing that Ruoger's wounds would be fatal shortly, and the look of the

poor cleaning boy's eyes, I lifted my eyes up to the sky, and healed the

man's wounds.  In a fit of anger and outrage at the thiefs brutality in

my home lands, I raced out of the cafe in search of the thief.  By mid

day, I found the thief half way to medienne, and in that spot, slayed him.

I quickly found the money he had stolen, and put it in my pouch. 

Returning to the cafe, I tended to Ruoger's wounds once more, and

returned his stolen money.  I then sat back down to my cold coffee, and

realized that other than the boy and Ruoger, the stranger I had met this

moring was the only one still here.

Upon seeing him, I offered the stranger a couple silver for lodging and a

meal, since the night was drawing near.  It was then that he declined it

with a wave of a hand, and he stood up.  Standing up, his appearance

changed, and the room lit brighter than day.  An aura eveloped him and it

shown even more splendid than the moring sun I had seen over the valey

this morning!  Awe, and overwhelmed, I fell to my knees, as this was no

mere mortal.  Speaking to me, he said, " Raltin, it is I Lonil.  I have

watched you closely, growing in this homeland, and it is today that you

proved yourself worthy.  I send you forth to be a man of valor.  One to

stand for the weak, giver of charities, and fighter for good.  Your sword

now fights in my name, and in my name you shall gather those loyal, and

couragous in the lands.  Your sign shall be a bleeding cross, a symbol

of the sword, it remains tall and firm, as should you always do.  The

blood will be a reminder of the fallen, your reason and strength for

fighting.  It will keep you on the path of goodness.  It is now your

time, go, and redeem your home land pure!"

With that, the stranger, Lonil, was gone, and my heart was set for a noble

cause.  Thus, I have decided to take into hiding, to prepare myself

strong for the fight ahead of me.  Seeking out my comrades, I will hown

my skills, till I am a master of them and myself.  I will then rise, to

my calling, and my home lands will again be pure......

~
897137067
The Story Of Malissin Silverbow~
Malissin~
In ages past, while humans occupied only a small portion of the world,

there lived a daughter of a respected family.  The maiden, Elasha, was a

seemingly fragile elf.  While at an early age she had been racked with a

nearly crippling fever.  When the fever broke it stole much of her

vitality.  At the time she was sick, a young servant by the name of

Thalaera Silverbow, remained with her during those long nights.  It was

no secret that Thalaera was in love with the maiden, but no one gave it

much thought since a servant was not allowed to court a lady such as

Elasha.


Elasha announced, rather tactlessly, her intentions to marry Thala, as

his friends called him, one night during a festival in her coming-of-age

of age party.  Her father refused and denounced Elasha while ordering

that Thala be confined to a cell the rest of his life.  Elasha flew into

a rage and lost control of her senses at hearing this.  In that moment of

rage she struck down her father with a ceremonial short sword she wore. 

The blade shattered in her hands ripping deep gashes in them.  As she

crumbled to her knees sobbing, Thala grabbed her and the two fled far

west to the remote reaches of the Vaasa.  Elasha's hands healed in time. 

She vowed that none of her daughters or her daughters' daughters would

ever wield a bladed weapon of any sort.


Elasha and Thala settled on the fringes of what is now known as the

Medienne Forest.  Thala brought with them only one item--an ironwood

sappling.  Together they planted it with the hope of leaving a lasting

reminder of elven love.


Generations later, encroching humans forced the remaining Silverbow

sibblings to flee to the Vaasa City, a home they never knew.  In lieu of

Elasha's vow, no daughter ever used a bladed weapon.  In time, the name

Silverbow became synonomous with the art of healing.  But the Silverbows

that fled to Vaasa were not met with open arms.  They were openly shunned

though they knew not why.


Malissin Silverbow was no different.  She was treated poorly by her

teachers when she entered the priesthood.  She bore the insults and

snickering well and never retaliated.  One night, as she lay sleeping,

she had a dream that would forever change her.  In her dream she saw

three dark elves escape from the royal prison pits.  These dark elves

stole into her room in the temple where she lived and took her to the

altar.  Then she saw the altar covered in drops of red.  She was awakened

by three forms at knife point and taken to the altar of Dawnstar.  It was

on the altar that the dark elves violated her innocence, taken like a

sacrifice.  When it was over, her weary head turned in time to see her

teacher sneaking out a secret door behind a tapestry.  The dark elves

escaped from Vaasa never to be seen by the elves again.


Mali confronted her teacher at breakfast that morning in front of the

order of priests.  After a series of heated exchanges between the high

priestess and Mali's teacher, it was confessed that the teacher freed the

dark elves and ordered them to assault Mali.  The teacher was exiled and

the high priestess offered Mali a choice; she could have spells cast on

her to rid her of the ability to bear a child or she could give birth to

the child but be forced to leave her studies in Vaasa.


Mali, knowing this decision was crucial to ending her ridicule, decided

to have the child observing that all life is sacred to elves.  Mali

announced, "I have endured hardship after hardship whether it be public

degradation from my own people or my family being forced to leave our

home by human expansion.  Yet I stand before you bearing no ill will to

those of my people who have harmed me save for my teacher.  Experience

has taught me what is right and what is wrong.  It is right to forgive,

it is right to further the good of my people.  I have learned that taking

an innocent life for sport is wrong.  With that in mind I have decided

that I will carry my child to term and leave it here with my family.  I

will then leave Vaasa and travel this world in search of those in need of

my help." What she neglected to say was that she was also going to hunt

for the three dark elves and her teacher.


So it was when Mali gave birth, she gathered her few belongings and

slipped unnoticed into the new world where humans were the dominant race. 

Mali received notice years later that her child had died in an accident

on the Windlass though no body was ever recovered.


Mali can be heard singing a poem that Elasha wrote.


Under the ironwood, light has dropped from the open sky.  Light, like a

companion in solitude.  A pure latticework of branches shining on every

leaf, flooding the ground like clean white snow.  An Ulannu sends its

piercing song high into the still air.  The world is an ocean overflowing

with water.

~
897146787
begining struggles~
Raltin~
In the comming days, from my encounter with Linol, I came to my first

true test.  It all happened in Pennan, when I entered and open villagers

hut.  Finding that the down stairs door was open, I entered, not knowing

who or what was down there.

To my suprise, I saw what seemed to be a villager being attacked by a

vyan.  Shocked and outraged, I quickly scrounged around the room for the

villagers belongings in the hopes of returning them to the right full

owner once things had settled.

In the following days, gossip of the brawl spread around the realm, and I

soon came to realize that the villager was really a deranged man, a man

by which the vyan had come in hopes of trading for a garnet.

After the vyan had paid the man, the man leaped at the vyan in hopes to

kill him, but in doing so, the villager drop the coins where the vyan

could not find.

In all, the vyan was out 400cp and the garnet wich the villager had not

given him in return.  In enlightment to the situation, I have determined

that the sum of the villagers belongings I had found the day of the

brawl, would be able to compensate the vyan in full.  A dusty pipe I had

found, and a crude digging stick laying on the ground.

In hopes to fix the situation, I have been in search of the vyan for whom

the villager had wronged, in hopes to return their rightful belongings. 

I would meet them in the shop keepers store, 3 or so blocks north of the

old villagers home.  I would also send them off with a gold piece, for

their troubles in returning to a town they surely are more cautious of

trading in.

With my busy schedule in preparing for my quest, I would hope the vyan

could reach me through some mail deamon as such.  They could reach me

through the name Raltin, as I'm sure the mail carrier knows me.

I am sorry for inconviencing the vyan in these details, but as the case

goes, I am not to quick to judge without all the facts.

Raltin......

~
897269711
Brothers. Hmph.~
Iarin~
They're always more trouble then they're worth, ya know.


I've been looking for mine for a while now.  I thought he'd be in Voaleth. 

He's a scholarly type -- always interested in books and magics and stuff. 

There's a couple of guys in robes -- I'dve figured Jarin was doing his

best trying to find some way to weasel them into teaching him.


But no!  I finally find my way down to this little hole-in-the-ground and

he's not here.  I'll find him.  We're not often apart -- he's my twin. 

Parents?  We don't need parents.  We've never needed 'em.  Just get ya

into trouble and make you eat icky broccoli and other sorts of healthy

stuff.  We're doing just fine.


Well, we were doing better before he took off exploring.  I know he's

around here somewhere.  I can feel him.  Twins are like that.  If ya see

him, can ya tell him his sister's lookin' for him?


Brothers.  Hmph.

~
897271071
Goldaxe Mission~
Mattoc~
Tirin and Mattoc Goldaxe are brothers and best friends.  They grew up in

the royal court of Kha-da.  Their father is Thane Goldaxe.  Both brothers

are in a large family of 14.  Mattoc and Tirin were not in line for the

throne.  Infact they were the two youngest males in the family.  While

growing up they showed great promise as warriors and had strong faith in

their god.  As Tirin and Mattoc were sparing one day a messenger from

their father's court summoned them to the throne room.  Thane Goldaxe had

tears rolling down his face and dripping off his beard when the brothers

got there.  Both brothers looked at eachother in silent understanding. 

They knew something had gone wrong for they had never seen their father

cry so openly.  The mightly Thane sighed and his shoulders trembled a

little.  "Tirin, Mattoc your brother Mithor has died." said the Thane

Tears swelled in the young lad's eyes.  Mithor has been in line for the

throne.  He was the Thane's oldests son.  " Lads I want you to find

anyone who knows anything about this in the realm." the older Goldaxe

bellowed.  the King then said " I'll have an escort take you to Chiiron. 

You will be dressed simply and wield only a dagger.  I shall give you a

few coins also.  Lads you've just celebrated your Full Beard Day you are

ready to experience the world.  " The broken dwarf then added " Never

forget your quest to find your brother's killers." "Listen carefully

brothers.  Never brag too much.  Kill evil things.  Above all else find

the assasins that killed your brother." 

~
897271388
fables~
Pulchit~
Mes momma says to me,

"Pulchit, yous eatses wits yous fingers, fork make hand falls off."

"Beating head on rock clear bats out of earses."

"No eatses effies on full moon or yous ears turn all pointy."

"Dirt keeps da plague away."

"Girses will brak yous fingies and pulls out yous hair.  No try to eats

dem." 

Mes poppa says to me,

"Pul, yous go and brings back dead thing for us eat.  No licks it this

time." 

"Keeps yous fingers outta mes nose."

"Why yous beats head against rock?"

"Grizzwy ates yous sister.  Gets her head back."

"Yous go messes up room, is too clean."

Mes proud mes parents.  Dey smarter dan me.

~
897369675
Bar tale.~
Belgar~
Hey, lemme tell you a'tale of a goblin I ran into once.  She was a real

dumb thing, y'see.  I was a wandering through the Black Hills with

Skittertooth and Tanglefoot m'faithful companions, hunting fer 'em.  They

like meat, and they're not great at the chasing down deer, they tend

t'want to find a nice hole and wait fer the animal to walk into the webs. 

I'm tryin' to get 'em used to the surface.  Anyways, where was I.  I'm

down at the Ehlanni, fillin' my canteen, and what do I see walkin' past

down the other side o'the river as bold as can be but a littl' goblin,

all in warpaint and feathers comin' out of her hair.  Curious, I picks up

m'axe, whistles quietly fer the girls, and sneaks after the greenskin. 

They're thieves, y'see.  The goblin doesn't see me, but it sees somethin'. 

It's cackling to itself, and waving shiny bits and dead rats, like goblin

shamans do, y'see.  I'm not too bad at the magick m'self, but I'm

curious, so I sneak around a little further, and see a bunch o'gnomes

sitting around a picnic blanket.  One of the young ones ups and walks

towards us.  The little goblin, she hides behind the rock, and follows

the gnome.  As the lad gets out'a sight of the picnic, she leaps out,

screams, waves her hands in the ear, and zaps the poor youngster with a

bolt of magic.  The gnome turns 'round, and gets in a kick and a yell

before the magic finishs 'im off, but it's only a second before the

gnome's dead.  I be testing the edge on my iron battleaxe at this point,

and I'm distressed t'see this murder.  The goblin darts away into the

forest, but I've been around some, I can track a miserable goblin, and

Tanglefoot's not bad either.  We catch up with the greenskin a little

away, it's chuckling to itself.  I motion Skitter into the tree, while I

step out, axe at the ready.  The goblin shrieks, waves it's hands, and

bolts of magic tear into me, nicely conducted through m'axe, but I'm one

of the Khedrun, and I'm not goin't fall over from a little magic.  My axe

swings, bites into the greenskin, who turns to run.  I probably

wouldn'tve caught them, 'cept for Skitter, who neatly lowered herself,

flipped a web over the gobbo, sunk two fangs in, and wrapped the little

thing up tight.  Useful encounter, really, 'cause it gave me another day

before the spiders got hungry to teach 'em how to catch a deer.

~
897475313
Little Elf Lost~
Freywin~
They tell me I was born in the Vaasa.  They tell me my parents were both

full blooded Llewyrr They tell us lots of things that are doubtful.  I

always wonder who "they" are.  Usually it is the simple minded elf on the

street, or the human who upon seeing your ears, dismisses you as "just an

elf".

None of these people KNOW me.  I don't know me.  I don't remember my

parents.  I don't remember Vaasa.  I could not find Vaasa to save my life

without help from a passing halfling.  My earliest memories are of

running with a pack of wolves.  I remember running naked through the

forest chasing down rabbits and deers with my brothers.  They accepted me

as I was, never judging me for the ELF that I was born.  I don't know how

long I ran with them.  I only remember the day an elderly Llewyrr found

me.  I supposed (in hindsight) he was a ranger.

Maybe he longed for a son of his own; maybe he felt pity for me.

In any case, he took me away from my friends (not without a fight from

me).  He spoke a few words in a tongue i've only recently learned to be

magic and the wolves that had been my family walked away from me.  I

hated them for leaving me and this strange "man" for taking me away.  He

clothed me and taught me many things about the forest.  What elvish I

speak I learned from him.  The name I have he gave to me.  It was his in

his life, and is now mine.

I miss my days of running wild in the woods, and I long for a time when I

can go back to the pack.  Alas, my mentor died recently.  He died

defending a family of weak and pathetic elves from an invasion of gobbos. 

I really don't care that gobbos kill the elves.  They are weak.  They are

not me.  But I do care that they killed my only friend.

I doubt I can ever go back to the wolves.  I expect I've changed to much

for them to accept me.  I hope I can make it in this "civilized" world. 

I sometimes wonder if vyans are right; perhaps WE are the ones who have

gone astray.

~
897747111
The Chance to Start Over~
Lorah~
I can't say that I remember exactly when it happened.  I had been going

about my normal routine - I had been lying on the banks of the River

Elhanni, day dreaming of my Love, Aeneas and counting the days until we'd

be together again.  I must have drifted off to sleep because I awoke

suddenly and in a strange and foreign place.  At first I thought it may

have been Death, as I've often been ambushed while sleeping, yet it

wasn't.  Perhaps it was the strange Portal - where I could call out the

name of the city I desired and instantly be there.


"Pennan", I called.  I was still in the same spot, my voice echoing

around me.  Then I heard it, a soft moan but I was unable to determine

where it was coming from.  That single moan began to multiply and I could

hear many souls crying out in anguish.


"Algesa?  Goddess?  Where am I?  In your name I beg for mercy!"


The laugh that followed chilled me to the core of my very being.

~
897873197
The Chance to Start Over (II)~
Lorah~
"Morr," the name came out nothing more then a whisper, I had heard the

laugh before as I've had the unfortunate luck to visit his realm on a

fairly frequent basis.


He laughed again.


"Alright, Lord Morr.  I've told you Pennan, why have you not complied?" I

demanded, trying to sum up every ounce of courage I had in me.


"You silly human *girl*," He hissed, stressing on the last word as he

knew my dislike for it.  "Do you really think you are in my domain?  You

have been there nearly half a hundred times and does this look like my

realm?" 


He had a point but I didn't want to give him the satisfaction.  "Well, if

this is not your realm, then why are *you* here?" 


"I've come to give you a second chance."


"A second chance?" I'm sure you could have heard me gulp audibly.  "A

second chance at what?" 


"The world has been turned upside down, and all is not what it once was. 

You can say the word and return to being your own pathetic human *good*

self or return to life as something better." 


"Something better?  I don't understand...." I was at a complete loss.


"Evil, you moron", I could hear him grumbling.


I laughed.  "Really, Morr, you know me better then that.  I follow Algesa."


It was silent for what seemed like hours.  I thought I'd won until he

uttered these words, "Where is your beloved goddess now?" 

~
897873915
The Chance to  Start Over (III)~
Lorah~
I felt like I'd been kicked in the gut.  I fought to find the answers

within my own heart and I came up empty.


"I don't know" and the truth was I *didn't*, I had always thought that

once you dedicated your heart and your life to her she would never fail

you - yet I called out her name and there came no reply - only the

haunting laugh of Morr.


"Well?"  He boomed.


"Perhaps she's just not answering me." It sounded feeble but I was afraid. 

"Why should I betray her and become evil?" 


"Aeneas" The one word answer cut through me like a knife aimed straight

at my heart.  "Do you really think that he'll stay married to you? 

You'll entertain him for a while, amuse him with your meager skills in

both the battlefield and his bed and then he'll continue on to someone of

his kind that can better occupy his time."


I felt like I couldn't catch my breath.  "THAT'S NOT TRUE!", I screamed. 

In my head I could see pictures, it was Aeneas with another woman,

holding her hand, kissing her, holding her.  I opened my eyes and the

images disappeared.  I knew they weren't happening, I knew they weren't

true but I had to steady myself.


"What about your father," his voice barely above a whisper, yet my entire

being screamed in pain.


"My father", I echoed.  Then it all flooded back to me - his drunken

binges, his clammy hands on my body, the bloody brawls that ensued.


"You do have evil inside you, Lorah," Morr sounded almost kind.  "You

know you do - you've shown it but once".


In my minds eye I saw what I'd locked away for so long: My fathers body

lying lifeless at my feet - I was covered in his blood, and the only

feeling that washed over me was relief.  "I killed him", it was a

statement.


I stepped forward and was reborn.

~
897874710
Making goblinade out of goblins~
Plagad~
Ug.  Me one day hungry.  Me want good meal.  Me in tall mountain.  Me say

to self "Me hungry, me want GOOD meal, me in tall mountain." And so me

think me hungry, me want good meal, me in tall mountain.  So I go and

find goblin.  I hit him 4 times with big sword and I eat him But me want

more food so I think think me hungry, me want good meal, me in tall

mountain.  So I go to place with big cats and kill woodpecker, then eat

it and me think think me hungry, me want good meal, me in tall mountain. 

So I says "Me hungry, me want good meal, me in tall mountain." So I go

and kill many goblin, cut ears off head and squeeze yellowy stuff out ear

and put in water.  And me drink!  ME feel good in tummy!  YEAH!

~
897958170
Goldaxe mission continued~
Mattoc~
As soon as Mattoc and Tirin got to Chiiron they went to the first place

any respectable dwarves would go, to the bar.  They spent the little

money that their father had given them quickly.  Mattoc lifted his

ale-fogged head up when he heard some local villagers talking about a

haunted mansion south of town.  Try to wake up his brother, who passed

out from too much ale, Mattoc kicked him from under the table connecting

solidly with his shin.  " What did ya do that for!?!" shouted Tirin. 

"Someone told us a good place to start exploring," Mattoc said shaking

his head to clear his fogged vision.  The brothers left a few coins on

the table and left the tavern.  On the way to the haunted mansion the

brothers kill some rabbits and devoured the meat to fill their rumbling

bellies.  Tirin stopped quickly and pointed to a roof top southward that

looked a little raggedy.  As the brothers worked their way to the mansion

they noticed large over grown hedges taller then they were.  Tirin

stopped by a well and rolled in the bucket.  Mattoc reached his hands in

the bucket to get some water but he discovered in horror that the bucket

was full of maggots!  Maggots flew in the air as Mattoc threw up his

hands and let out a girlish scream.  Tirin sighed loadly as Mattoc jumped

down out of his arms.  "Sorry," Mattoc said hanging his head in shame "

you know I hate bugs." Tirin thought for a second then said," Brother we

are on our own and we must not show weakness.  We are knights now and we

need to start acting like them." Mattoc showed he agreed and hefted his

axe with a grumble.  The two dwarves pulled up infront of the mansion and

went inside.  No sooner had they gone in then a giant cockroach attacked

them!  Working side by side the brothers gleefully humed a battle song

and choped the cockroach to an unrecognizable pile of goo.  They wondered

around the mansion awhile untill they came across a dwarf thief with a

long scar along his head.  Both brothers thrust out there hands in

greeting.  The dwarf sneered at them and spit on the ground.  With a

worried look on their faces the brothers tightened their grip on their

axes.  " Been awhile since I saw slime like you!" said the thief with a

snarl.  Bristling Tirin said, " The thane's son our brother was killed

you wouldn't know anything about this would you?" "Aye I do but you'll

have to kill me before i talk to swine like you!" , The thief spit our

while leaping to attack Mattoc.  The thief's spear grazed Mattoc's.  Both

brothers attacked at the same time causing more damage then someone of

their experience should cause.  Soon the dwarf thief was leaking blood

from many places and he was dieing.  In dieing a voice barely above a

whisper the said, "A dwarf cleric who thinks he is a wizard has an army

of giant rabbits.  He asked me if I would like to make some gold and

bring down your brother." With that last breath the dwarf died.  Mattoc

said, "Well he won't be needing these coins." Then took coins from the

corpse.  "Well we better find this other dwarf." said Tirin The brothers

set off just as the sun set in the sky.

~
898389929
Part 1 - A Knight's Story~
Cylaria~
The child stood atop a large, grassy hill, sun and wind dancing through

his hair.  He gazed out across the valley, which seemed to glitter in the

glorious sunlight.  At on end, a river fed in, after gathering itself

from smaller tributaries and mountain run-off it seemed content to rest a

while, passing casually through the basin, gathering itself for the

head-long dash down the countryside that was to follow within a few miles.


Smiling, he sat and began to unpack the simple lunch his mother had

prepared.  Behind him a large, powerful stallion grazed, the contrast in

sixe of the two individuals striking, yet neither had observed any such

distinctions.  They were, as it seems, and everyone agreed, made for each

other.  Whilst locks of hair tangled and flew into his face, Utopia

removed the contents of his meal from the cloth, a quick repast, bread,

cheese, a little meat and a small, chewy, toffee-like sweet his mother

had made the previous morning.  He lay back and looked towards the clouds

lazily floating far above.  He closed his eyes after a time and dozed,

satisfied with the meal and the way the day was progressing.


As the sun climbed to it's highest point all seemed quiet, the light nap

not disturbed by man nor beast.  That was until Lightmane, saw fit to

rouse Utopia with a gentle nudge as the shadows started to grow longer

and the sun began its descent.  Grumbling and playfully chiding his steed

Utopia awoke and stretched before standing and taking the hold of the

dangling rein to bring his mount's head down to a level such that a sweet

could be offered.  Surprisingly however Lightmane refused the gift,

shaking his proud head and standing straight again, looking up towards

home, not visible, over the hill, but not far away.  Taken aback Utopia

reached up, bringing the morsel to his friend's mouth, again it was

refused, this time the movement away from the treat accompanied by a

worried neigh.  Forgetting the sweet Utopia turned and followed the

stallion's gaze, where just over the crest of the hill, a small wisp of

smoke was appearing.


Suddenly anxious, Utopia made a quick gesture, pulling quickly on the

reins, commanding the stallion lower, such that the boy could mount it. 

Quickly he did so, hauling himself in a practiced though still awkward

manner, into the saddle.  Once seated, he immediately leaned forward,

touching his heels to the stallion's sides, and ordered a gallop. 


Lightmane had been a gift.  He had grown up in a neighbouring country. 

Owned by a landed knight, he was his favoured steed, which he always rode

into batlle upon and with whose help the knight had slain many an enemy

of the King.  It was in a year of war when the army had begged permission

to cross Utopia's homeland in order that they could reinforce the army

against agressors from the north, the war had gone well for the defenders

though some were slain and the knight had been badly wounded.  Whilst his

army passed through the valley, the chirurgeons had decided that he was

too weak to continue home, and asked Utopia's family if they would accept

him for a time, allowing him accomodation until the knight recovered from

the wounds and could continue on his way.

Though the family had little to offer, such was the honour of simply

being asked such a boon, they could hardly refuse, and indeed the knight

was taken in, given food, a warm bed and cared for.  For a time the

infection in the wounds seemed poised to end his life, but slowly the

tide turned, his fight for life strong and after several weeks the knight

returned from the edge, recovering from his delirium filled slumber and

finally opening his eyes to the relief and delight of his care-givers. 

While still confined to bedrest he became great friends with all the

family, telling stories of his battles and adventures to Utopia and his

older sister, Cylaria, spell-binding tales which showed them a glimpse of

a life they had no idea could exist.  One that they had never

contemplated, as their life was a simple, country affair, in this

paradise setting that sustained them through the years.  Gradually the

knight, Sir Aravis, regained his strength and was able to leave his bed

and venture outside, recovering quickly in the fresh air and helping the

family with chores during the day, tutoring the children in the evening

and, as their interest in such matters developed, teaching Utopia and his

sister a little of the art and skill of swordplay.


As time progressed, Sir Aravis decided he was ready to return home, but

though he was glad to be returning to his lady wife his heart was

saddened at the thought of leaving the family who had taken him in and

brought him back to life.  Such was the grateful nature of this noble

lord, that on the final day, as the family was ready to give him their

final, teary send-off he turned, knelt before them and begged that he

could show them some measure of his thanks.  He gave to Cylaria a sword,

crafted from the finest steel, balanced to perfection and hilted with a

small diamond.  Saying that the diamond would never stand up to

comparison with her eyes the knight found himself embraced, a tearful,

elated girl attached to his neck in a hug she never wanted to end. 

Finally they parted and Aravis turned to Utopia.


"To you my young friend," he began, "I charge you with a great

responsibilty.  My steed has found a new home and I would be loath to

remove him from the joy and fine grass he has found here.  I ask you to

keep him, may he serve you, and you alone with all the honour and

strength that he has served me." 


And with that the knight turned, whispered a quick goodbye to the

stallion, picked up a saddle-bag and began a march towards his homeland,

leaving a dumbfounded youth and an elated family behind.


As Lightmane had once been able to charge in full gallop with full plate

barding and an armoured knight on his back, now he positively flew with

the near-insignificant weight of a boy to burden him.  Thunder echoed

from his gait as the land rushed by.  Such was their haste that it was

not until much later that Utopia realized the harm he would have been

caused had he fallen from the saddle, but with that, he also knew that no

 harm could befall him with Lightmane as his mount.


As he crested the hill, and came into view of his home all hopes he had

that the smoke was an illusion were dashed.  Before him lay a scene he

would remember til the last.  His home was barely recognisable, a fire

had destroyed most of it, the rest had crumbled, matching the state of

the smaller buildings where animal were housed and essentials stored. 

The ground had been chewed up by the footfalls of many horses, dozens of

tracks lead away in the same direction, showing full measure of the

numbers that had assaulted this, thus-far peaceful home.

(continued in Part II)

~
898643405
Part II - A Knight's Story~
Cylaria~
They raced forward, covering the distance to home within a number of

heartbeats.  In terror Utopia leapt from Lightmane's back almost before

he had fully halted.  Running into the rubble a cried out, yelling for

his parents and family, crying their names and finally collapsing in

despair upon the earth.  Lightmane's soft nicker eventually brought his

head up and he turned to see Cylaria running towards him, tears streaming

down her face, staining her cheeks.


He stood, frozen as she embraced him, they fell to the ground and once

each had composed themselves she related to him how the strangers had

come, their parents had sent her to the hills to find him and warn him

not to come near until it was safe.  She had taken the sword to defend

herself, her skill having developed due to long hours practice, she had

become strong and more beautiful since Aravis had inspired her to fight,

a fine woman who would have all that she desired, except now all she

desired was to have her parents back.


It was as the first few spots of rain were began to fall that once again

Lightmane neighed a warning.  The siblings glanced up, neither knowing

what to expect, but fearing the worst.


And the worst was coming.


The vanguard of the raider's group was coming, thundering over the hill

towards the decimated buildings.  Seeing that the weapons were drawn,

Utopia knew that if they did not flee they would be slain, or worse, so

they jumped towards Lightmane and threw themselves onto his back, Utopia

holding the mane, Cylaria sitting behind, clutching the reins in hands

unfamiliar to the mount.  Sensing urgency Lightmane turned away from the

raiders and leapt into a gallop.  Across the flat area of land that had

been their home they charged, racing against a foe they had not known and

now wish they did not.  As the ground became softer with the rain which

was setting in, great clods of dirt were torn up by Lightmane's mighty

hooves as he galloped away, his two charges clinging to his back.


A wood soon raced to meet them, the well-defined treeline breaking for an

instant to allow a path to enter.  The escapers changed course slightly

and aimed for it, Cylaria daring a glance behind to see how the pursuit

was coping.  But coping they were, still a ways behind and gradually

falling back the raiders had not lost heart, and so into the wood they

rode, daring the branches and twigs to unseat them.


The path was fairly clear however, and as they rounded a slight bend hope

flared in their hearts, they would make it, live to see another day.


Suddenly from a bend ahead emerged another figure, charging towards them

they saw a drawn sword and an evil grin.  A raider from the first group

had doubled back to check the vanguard, now he spied the youngsters and

would put an end to them.


Lightmane though had seen this before, his time in battle with Sir Aravis

had not been lost, and as they neared, he deftly swerved towards the

raiders steed.  With collision imminent the lesser horse panicked,

dodging away, though it was too late.  The horses glanced off each other,

the raiders slash ruined, his shot wide as he fell from his mount. 

Lightmane fared better, though the impact caused him to stumble, and

Cylaria, with the most tenuous grip slipped from his back and crashed to

the mud.  Halting, whirling, Utopia faced the raider who had recovered

his footing and was moving towards Cylaria with murderous intent.  The

stallion though moved forward, blocking the raider and rearing in

Cylaria's defence.  Utopia barely managed to hold on as Lightmane's front

hooves lashed out, catching the raider's head and torso.  He flew

backwards, a fatal wound opened in his skull and a crushed chest spelling

his demise.  But it was not finished.


As Cylaria remounted, they glanced back down the path.  Now the vanguard

was just coming into view, rounding the corner.  Again Lightmane

accelerated, fleeing with his wards.


The children knew a little of this wood, and Cylaria also knew that the

raiders were closing the distance, Lightmane having to start from

standing once again.  She yelled forward to Utopia, "One of us must live,

find our parents if they are still alive, avenge them if they are not!"

As they rounded the first of a quick succession of turns in the path

Utopia guessed her plan, he leant forward and patted Lightmane's neck his

words lost in the wind, then waited for it..


"Good luck!" They both cried in unison, and with that Cylaria pushed him

from Lightmane's back, he hit the ground and rolled uncerimoniously into

the undergrowth at the side of the path, catching only a fleeting glimpse

of Cylaria's back as she thundered around the next bend.  Ducking low he

held his breath as the raiders flashed past, and long after they had

passed he held still and silent.  Knowing that Cylaria would escape if it

was possible he whispered a vow...

"Know this, my dear sister, a thousand beasts shall not stop me, nor a

thousand swords stand in my way, I shall find thee and Lightmane, and

then together we will find our parents!" A look of pure determination set

upon his face, matched only by the determination in his heart.  As he

turned into the forest he knew that someday they would be reunited, until

then....who knows?

To be continued...

~
898644021
Elf loaf recipe~
Kierthos~
This is a wonderful recipe passed down through my family for years, which

coincidentally, I also found in a trollish recipe book.


Enjoy!


Ingredients:

------------


One fully-grown elf (may substitute two elf kiddies)

One pound croutons

Ten cups beef gravy

Salt and pepper to taste


Directions:

-----------


Take meat from elf (trolls may add the bones for roughage), add the

gravy, croutons, and salt and pepper.  Stuff into a large pan.  Cook

until done.


Serves 4 (or one troll)

~
898666951
Little Deg part 1~
Deg Rockfoot~
He reached into a worn leather pouch and pulled out a small smoothe

stone, placed it in he sling and began to slowly approach.  The deer

stood on the other side of a small stream that wound lazily though the

forest north of the village.  Barefoot, and clad in light, supple

leather, Deg barely made a sound as he made his way to his kill.  Placing

one foot skillfully in front of the other he circled the sling and it

began to gain momentum.  The deer lifted its head perhaps curious about

the soft whistling sound the cord made as it completed its round.  The

water was a mere tree length away with the prey standing on its opposite

bank.  The deer bolted!  Deg cursed and leaped into a full sprint toward

the bank, the sling now in full fury rotating round and round, making a

shrill pitch that sounded not unlike the cry of a angered zuralduur.  The

deer stuck off toward deep forest and would take hours to track if it

made it.  Little Degs legs seemed to cover entirely more distance than

seemed halflingly possible and he lept from the bank toward the thick

wood-line.  Mid-air he let his finger release one half of the cord and

watched as the stone whined as straight as a llewyrr arrow, heard the

hollow crack as the stone crushed the stags skull, then nothing......

~
898725611
Little Deg Part 2~
Deg Rockfoot~
Little Halfling Deg Rockfoot awoke to find him self lying face first, on

the opposite stream bank, with a mouthful of silt.  Sputtering he stood,

head pounding reminding him of the time he fell off the entrance platform

in the The City of Vaasa.  Rubbing his head, he shakily stood and turned

to see what stopped him in mid-flight.  A broken tree limb dangling down

from midway up a water oak dipped its leaves down into the stream

as if to cool its branches from the heat of the day.  Deg dusted off his

leather, removed his sandals from around his neck and placed them on his

feet.  "Hum..." he mumbled, "now where did that deer go?" The bank gave

way gently under his feet as he climbed the other side, eyes focused on

the last place he remembered seeing the deer.  Blood?  It was here but

not in the condition it should be.  This was dried blood, and from the

flies feasting on it had been sun-baked for at note least a couple days. 

A puzzled look came over his face as his thoughts began to clear and he

wondered how long he had been laying there.  His stomach was empty as a

trolls head, and he grabbed some fruit off a nearby bush growing on the

soil rich bank.  "I'm gonna be cleaning till I'm grown for not being

home!", Deg exclaimed to no one in particular, for this was Deg.  The

water was cool, and came up to his knees (which actually very shallow )

as he left the stream and began a brisk pace down the narrow forest trail

to his village.  The path was difficult to follow for the untrained, and

was slightly overgrown, with brush-sedge and flesh plants.  A light rain

began to fall, and the smell of rich forest began to invigorate Deg.  He

picked up the pace and noticed a small pouch laying beside the path. 

Stooping down (not far though, for halflings are not very tall)Deg picked

it up and looked through the contents.  A human ear!  A halfling's Finger!

Who would do something like this!, he thought as his mind raced.  A flash

of lightening burst a nearby tree into flames.  Deg, his small frame

shaking, took the bag and flung it into fiery tree.  The rain worsened

and Deg felt a fear begin to creep into his soul.  Another bolt of

lightening, more thunder.  Not sure what he would find back at the

village he walked at a slower pace.  Whiiisss Thump!  Whiiis Thump!  Two

arrows bury themselves within a foot of where he was.  Rolling over

cattails growing along the stream bank, Deg strained to find the attacker. 

Whissss thump!  Another arrow hits somewhere in the brush.  Crawling on

his hands and knees he glimpsed three goblin archers approaching where he

first entered the stream's vegetation.  Suddenly a hand covers his mouth

and pulls him into a small washed out cave hidden in a bend.  Water

lapped around Little Deg's ankles, and a small water-bug playfully swam

in and out between his hairy toes, completely oblivious to the situation. 

The hand was dropped and Deg turned to face his savior.  Before him stood

a stalwart halfling with fiery red hair.  "What is going on!?", Deg

pleaded.  The other halfling looked at Deg as if sizing him up, bowed and

introduced himself as "Ganelon".  Still confused Deg returned the

 curtesy and offered Ganelon his name.  "Deg Rockfoot, Sir, pleased to

meet you...but can you", "shhhh" Ganelon said, as he pointed back toward

the far dark corner of the cavern.  In the back a copper-haired elf with

an other worldly charm knelt on her knees holding prayer beads, praying

and mumbling.  As she stood tendrils of healing energy danced up and down

her hands lighting up the room with a calming glow.  Raising one eyebrow

as halflings often do, Deg glanced back at Ganelon with a quizzical look. 

"Sit down little Deg", Ganelon said with a voice of confidence, "You have

to be strong for what I'm about to tell you." Deg's stomach felt full of

lead as he listened.  " There has been a goblin raid on your village.  We

are trying to make it to the Dwarven city of Kha-da to organize a group to drive

them back to their caves.  Gulping loudly, Deg Rockfoot nodded.  The elf

at the back of the cave stood and walked toward where they stood.  Robes

swishing she walked with a pride and stiffness that made her seem to

float along instead of striding.  Ganelon placed a hand to steady himself

as he led the others out of the cave and into the now drizzling rain. 

Forest smell filled the air and the rising water lapping over the edge of

the north bank might have set a feeling of peace and contentment had it

not been for the current situation.  They crawled up to the edge of the

bank Ganelon tightened his rope belt around his robes and pointed at a

goblin archer a few feet away.  The goblin was about 4 foot tall with a

smell that would make a orc smell like a tavern wench looking for

business.  His clammy skin was covered with a slime that no doubt was

infested with untold parasites that seemed to enjoy companionship with

most goblins.  Ganelon slipped a pair of dented pair of brass knuckles

onto his right hand and moved behind the goblin with the stealth of a

lynx.  He kicked the goblin in the back and drove his face into the

ground.  Whiiisss thump!  a streaking arrow nicked Ganelon in the left

arm and he, out of instinct rolled to the ground to make himself a

smaller target.  The cleric, (Fleur, she told me her name was on the trip

to Kha-Da) came over the bank after Ganelon.  A fire burned deep in her

eyes as energy crackled and danced her forearms to her finger tips, she

reached out with her left hand, touched Ganelon and his wounds healed! 

Reaching forward with her right hand she pointed a forefinger at the

goblin struggling to recover from Gan's rush, and cast a curse on him.  A

haze came over his eyes and foam began to come out of his mouth.  Ganelon

stood and in one leap was in-between Fleur and the nasty little creature.

Deg watched in amazement as one second Ganelon's hand was held at the

ready, the next second the goblin let loose a hiss as he looked at the

hole that appeared in his chest.  Ganelon pulled his hand from the goblin

and grinned.

~
898730510
Rememberances in Me Absence~
Bwithh~
ahhhhhhh, the visions come and go like the fwittewing of birdshine in the

tweeleaves of the feathered bedding of the sky, but still, wesounding nd

stwident, like bellies on the moonday, the wevered wisdoms they speak like

beetwoot on stony, bouncy paths...


---------------------------------------------------------------------------

"Filtering is like supping at the Grand Banquet Table of Human Wisdom and

refusing when your host offers you the pickled walnuts."   

---------------------------------------------------------------------------


---------------------------------------------------------------------------

"Broccoli is delicious when stir-fried with chopped garlic and Chinese

Oyster Sauce." 

--------------------------------------------------------------------------


doobiedoobie doo :)

~
898784480
Schloff's Cukbuk!~
Schloff~
Dis ish Schloff's cukbuk an' I'm heer twoday to teel yoo about mah

favorite all time oger cwizeen.  Iz callt "Bluddy mess on thee grownd",

and thee ingreedeeintz includ an elf maden because thay ar eesiest to

bash in two thee grownd.  First theeng yoo doo is git a big club that yoo

KNO is trusthworthee for klobering soft mushy tings.  Then yoo find an

elf maden.  Then yoo KLOBBER AND KLOBBER AND KLOBBER hehehahaha.  Now yoo

hav a bluddy mess on thee grownd and iz redy to eat!

~
898903715
Schloff's Danceeng Fun~
Schloff~
Hi iz Schloff agan and I'm heer too teel yoo abowt how a propr oger shud

dans.  This iz a dans I call "Pleez don't stomp on mee yoo crazee oaf!"

It getz musch attenchun.  First, yoo gots to sweeng yoor hed back an

forth in a wide arc so's yoo can cleer the area.  Nekst, yoo hop and jump

arownd into peeple you dont like (elfs and halfings and goblins make good

targits).  Then yoo take owt yoor trusty klobber stick and go KLOBBER

KLOBBER KLOBBER KLOBBER hahahahaha.  Eferyone pleeds wif you not to stomp

on dem and klobber dem, but then the dans would not bee so funn, wud it?

~
898911183
Song Excerpt~
Kierthos~
Why mash down a village when cow's fresh afield?

Or chase down a horse when the knight's newly peeled?

.     Don't work when there's eatin' to end!


Why close yer fat eyes when the pot's bubblin' full?

Or go down t' the cave after only one bull?

.     Don't sleep when there's eatin' to end!


Why challenge a troll if yer elf is half done?

Or toss for the boat if there's fish by th' ton?

.     Don't fight when there's eatin' to end!


Why walk with yer brother or stay with yer mate?

When some other fool might be lickin' yer plate?

.     No, food is an ogre's best friend!


- From "Food is an Ogre's best friend" Author unknown

~
898999882
New recipe~
Kierthos~
As promised, here is the recipe for lizardman stew


Ingredients:

------------

One pound lizardman meat

One half (1/2) cup flour (That's flour, not Fleur)

One teaspoon salt

One half (1/2) teaspoon pepper

Three tablespoons cooking oil

One and one half (1-1/2) cups water

Two onions, sliced and seperated

Three potatoes, cubed

Three carrots, sliced

Three stalks celery, sliced


Directions:

-----------

Cut meat into bite-size pieces.  In a small sack, combine flour, salt,

and pepper.  Put pieces of meat in sack, a handful at a time, and shake

to coat.  Reserve flour.  Brown meat in fat until browned on all sides. 

Add water, cover and cook over low heat until tender (about 2-1/2 hours). 

Add vegtables to pan and continue cooking until tender (about 30 minutes). 

If needed, thicken with reserved flour.


When vegtables are tender, remove from heat and serve.


Next week: Troll surprise!

~
899182510
Atsue:The forging of a blade.~
Atsue~
i have almost finished writing a story about myself and how i came to pursue the magical arts..

~
899213868
Severance~
Fingolfin~
Severance,

The birds of leaving call to us,

yet here we stand

endowed with the fear of flight.


Overland

the winds of change consume the land,

while we remain

in the shadow of summers now past.


When all the leaves

have fallen and turned to dust,

will we remain

entrenched within our ways.


Indifference,

the plague that moves throughout this land

Omen signs

in the shapes of things to come.


@BTomorrow's child is the only child.

~
899330394
A Knight's Story, Part III~
Cylaria~
Cylaria sped on, Lightmane carrying her like the wind. Through light brush,

over open plains and finally to a town, offering shelter and food.


Exhausted from her flight she dismounted, glad to find respite. She had long

since left the raiders behind, but her rear was sore from the riding and

Lightmane was tired too. Approaching the gate she raise both her hands,

keeping them away from her sheathed sword. Lightmane followed a few steps

behind. From the walls a shout came forth.."Halt!, be you friend or foe?!"


Taking a chance she shot back "Friend to those who offer food and fire, foe

to those that pursued me through the forest!"


A long pause, then a slow creaking as the gate reluctantly opened. A guard ran

foward and bowed, "I assure you milady, we hold no love for the bandits that

roam these parts, our home is yours if you wish."

Not used to such pleasantry, having been isolated from most strangers during

her life, she nodded quickly and curtseyed. Taking Lightmane's reins they

moved inside the gate, it closing noisily behind them.


Inside the walled village she took a moment to gaz upon her surroundings. To

her north a large structure dominated. Made of wood and roofed with hay, it

looked permanent and strong, offering warmth. From a stone chumney a curl of

woodsmoke wafted, and from inside a scent of cooking meat enticed her to enter.

The walls of the village were fashioned from thick trunks, driven into the

to the wall, allowing defenders to stand atop and guard the village. Behind

her, the gate rose, made solidly from thick planks and barred by a solid beam.

She had little doubt it would hold against attack. Flanking the gate, on the

left, a tower stood, several guards standing watch atop it, most armed with

bows or crossbows and all in armour, though most looked rusty and ill-fitting.


The guard led her towards the large, central hut, and introduced himself on

the way as Genall, the captain of Calahold's Guard. Smiling he held the door

for her, then told her he would settle Lightmane in the stables and see he was

fed.


Within the hall, a large number of people had gathered, sharing the fire and

stories. Most looked like peasants and farmers that populated the village, but

some stood out as outsiders. One burly, bearded, blond man wore the armour and

arms of a Knight, his helm resting on the table nearby, and his longsword at

his side. Another, this time a minstrel in fine clothing was singing a cheery

tune to the crowd of children that had gathered at his feet. Finally a tall,

dark stranger, drawn close to the fire, and shivering, obviously a new

arrival, still recovering from the cold. Turning to the short woman that

now approached she smiled and curtseyed.

"Come from the cold 'ave we?" the woman asked, "aww, such a little scrap as

yerself shouldn't be out on a night like this." She took Cylaria's hand and led

her towards the fire, pushing her way through the crowd and angrily snapping

at any who complained. Cylaria muttered soft apologies but took her seat close

to the flames, next to the dark stranger and removed her scabbard, placing it

across her lap.


The dark stranger looked up and smiled, "Hmm, a rare beauty," he began, "one

not used to these climes?" The question did not require an answer and so she

did not provide one, simply opting to nod politely in his direction.

The stranger continued, after returning the gesture. "My name is Relacin, and

I too hail from afar, what brings you to this fine town?"

"My name is Cylaria, and I come here not through choice. My family is gone and

I fled from the raiders as they come for me." she began to sniffle, the events

of the day finally sinking in as she had time to reflect.


Soon food was brought to her, and the others populating the hall, a rich stew

of beef and vegetables, with thick gravy flavoured with herbs. Bread and

wine was offered to and Cylaria hastily tucked in, glad of the nourishment.

If nothing else, the people of the town were the most hospitable she had ever

met and the cook first-rate. Soon she was warm and , and a full tummy and

an empty wooden goblet testifying to her contentment.


Finally she rose from the table and approached the Knight, his loud and cheery

voice had echoed around the hall as he also enjoyed the company of the

villagers and entertained all that listened to his tales. Most of the

villagers had now returned to thier smaller homes, and retired to bed, but the

Knight was still going strong and as she drew near he refilled his goblet with

some more wine.


The remaining villagers surrouunding him stood and politely bowed as she sat

down then left towards the fire. Cylaria didn't know how to begin, but

before she could, he stood and knelt on one knee, taking her hand and kissing

his thumb, an extremely polite gesture, one unassuming of any intimacy. His

voice softened as he sat down in his place,

"My lady, 'tis an honor to meet you, though I know not your story I saw you

approach the building and noted your steed, a magnificent animal. You must

be tired may I offer you wine?"


She nodded, "Yes please, my name is Cylaria, and the pleasure is mine."


The Knight gasped, "My deepest apologies, where were my manners?" he said,

realising his lack of introduction. "My name is Trebassin, a Knight of Lolin,

and I am in your service."



Intrigued, Cylaria continued. "Lolin? a town?"

The Knight laughed and smiled. "No, my dear, I pray to Lolin, the God of Valor,

that he may guide me in my path, and tonight he has lead me to you. I am not

surprised however that you have not heard of him, our following is small and

few carry our standard."


Suddenly shifting, Cylaria grabbed her arm. The fabric of her dress had

touched a scratch she had gained from a stick in her flight through the woods

and now it smarted.


Concerned, Trebassin asked to look, and Cylaria rolled up her sleeve. Frowning

he noted that the wound was deeper that a scratch and would not heal quickly.

He smiled and simply spoke "Do you trust me?"

"Of course," she replied, not really having to think about it.

"Very well" he said and slowly brought a hand to the scratch, smiling and

closing his eyes he whispered a quick phrase. A slight yellow glow came from

beneath his hand where it touched Cylaria's arm and a sweet warmth entered

her arm and flowed through her body, bringing a relaxation to her she had not

felt before. When he raised his hand from her arm, the scratch was gone,

completely healed, as if it had never been.


To be continued.

~
899341922
Home Once Again~
Ellania~
@I@IAfter an evening spent in contemplation at the Crown of the World, I

greeted Dawnstar, the rising star of morning, with ambivalence, shedding

tears of mirth and sadness.

@I@I"Green is the morning, daughter, as fair as your smile." My father's

traditional greeting left me blinking away a few lingering droplets while

managing a weak grin.  He studied me for several long minutes before

speaking again.

@I@I"So soon do you regret the duties you took upon yourself, dear one?"

@I@I"Never!" I replied, then turned to gaze off towards the west.  "When

will our people truly be one again, father?  How can it be accomplished?"

@I@IAfter another brief period of scrutiny, my father spoke once more. 

"There is something deeper troubling you.  What is it?" 

@I@II whirled to face him.  "How can the Guard survive when its members

throw away their honor?  How can I make them understand what they are

doing?  My heart is filled with compassion for their ignorance, but my

mind tells me to hold them accountable to the full measure!" Sighing, I

grew quiet again.

@I@I"You have been away too long, as I had feared." My father began to

gently lecture.  "The heart and mind are one.  Spirit and reason are one. 

The idea that they are seperate is a human concept, and not one I would

have you to accept.  You must seek out a resolution to your thoughts." 

@I@IHe paused a moment.  "But to answer your questions, I do not know.  I

can tell you I had similar misgivings long ago, when the Old One called

us together again.  But things worked out as he had foreseen, although it

took time." 

@I@IAnother thought came to him as he continued, "That's another trait

you are picking up from outside, impatience.  You must pray for patience,

dear one, and encourage it in others." Once more he stopped to choose his

words.

@I@I"You speak of their ignorance, and it may be so to some degree, but I

remind you: We are all ignorant, all wise, all blissful children, and all

elderly sages.  The path you have chosen is one of honor and duty, but

honor does not come easily, nor is it held easily.  And honor is not the

same thing as wisdom.  This path is not for everyone, not even for all

who have sworn to the Old One to keep it." 

@I@II started to protest, but he raised his hand and went on.  "If you

spend all your effort exhorting those who are not keeping their oath, you

will not have enough energy left to keep to your own duty.  What you need

is a narrower focus, a clearer path.  If the old vines are making

withered grapes, it is time to grow new stock." 

@I@IFather motioned for me to kneel, anointed me with oil, and called

down the blessings of Dawnstar as the glow in the forest continued to

grow lighter.

@I@I"The time has come for me to tell you more of our family's past, and

to charge you with a higher purpose." 

@I@IHe looked out over the great trees and deeply inhaled the misty

morning air.

@I@I"The changewinds are indeed blowing...."

~
899352692
A Knight's Story, Part IV~
Cylaria~
Eyes full of wonder, Cylaria gazed at her arm where the scratch had been.

Trebassin smiled and grinned, "Just a little trick I know."

They began talking, though Cylarias eyelids grew steadily heavier, and

eventually she fell asleep.


She awoke peacefully, then started as she realised her unfamiliar

surroundings. The small room had a soft bed, and light was streaming in

through the window. Besides the bed and a small, well used candle the room was

empty. Cylaria got out of bed and stood, then realised she was not wearing her

own clothes, rather a soft silky night gown. Her own clothes had been washed

and placed at the foot of her bed, she moved towards them and picked the up,

breathing in their smell. They had the faintest hint of woodsmoke, obviously

they had been washed and dried in front of the fire during the night.


Dressing quickly she left the room, and entered the main hall to which it was

attached. Very few people were here, a couple of the guards, the kindly woman

and the minstrel who was gathering his belongings into a large backpack.


The woman looked up and smiled at her, "Eh?" She said, "finally woken up ave

we? Bout time too, almost lunch time." The smile reassured Cylaria and she

thanked the woman and moved out through the main doors into the sunlight.


Outside, was busy, women were gathering, performing chores together, few men

were around, probably tending fields outside the walls, thought Cylaria,

though there was a large number of guards in a group facing away from her.

From within the knot of people she could hear the clang of sword on steel, and

curious she approached.


The men were watching two of their number, including Genall in combat with

Trebassin. The Knight was fighting well, always engaging one opponent, keeping

the other off balance, and occasionally tapping one of the other on a piece of

armour with the flat of his sword, to indicate when they had left their guard

down. The two guards were breathing hard, obviously tiring and soon Trebassin

commanded a halt. The rest of the group grinned and helped their comrades to

their feet, some jeers at their expense were made, but all light-hearted,

knowing that it had been a lesson for them all, that they all needed the


practice. After some comments from Trebassin the group dispersed, leaving

Cylaria and Trebassin alone in the yard.

Trebassin held his sword loosely, and wiped away a bead of sweat from his

brow, before kneeling on one knee and bowing to Cylaria, when he stood, he

smiled and spoke "Sleep well my lady? I hope the sounds of the practice did

not disturb your slumber, you looked like you  needed all the rest you could

get.

"Quite well, and no, I was not disturbed. I offer my thanks for the rest and

the sleepwear."

Trebassin laughed "Ho, the thanks should go to my lady wife, it was from her

wardrobe the garment came, and she that put it on you in your dozey state."

Smiling, Cylaria looked at him, now able to see clearly the man she had only

been able to see in a crowded, dimly-lit room the night before. He was tall,

and heavy-set, with a full, light beard and twinkling eyes. The sword he

carried at his side was a good length, just missing the ground if he let it

dangle from his hand, and was highly polished. The steel bore an intricate

pattern of waves and colours, a mix of dark and light. His shield, worn on his

left arm, bore arms ,a silver dragon, clutching a fiery orb on a green

background, within a golden border that was drawn like battlements. His armour

too was well cared for, clean and free of rust, and when he moved it jingled

softly, rather than squeak, like the armour of the guards.


More boldly she asked, "Good Sir, do you instruct women in the arts of combat

as you do the men?"

"Ahh, so few of the fairer folk take up the sword milady, but yes, Lolin sees

no harm in women fighting. And I would teach you if you gave me the honour."

"Would now be a bad time to start?" Cylaria enquired, keen to learn from such

a master.

"But of course, as milady wishes," Trebassin replied, "may I see your sword?"

Cylaria, half drew the sword she carried from the scabbard and Trebassin

approached, knowing the etiquette required. He did not touch the blade, nor

take it from her grasp, but simply looked at the hilt and the blade.

it?"

"It was a gift, from a Knight that passed our way and was forced to stay. When

he left, he gave this to me, and Lightmane to my brother."

"Lightmane?" replied Sir Trebassin, "ahh! The mighty steed that delivered you

to the gate. I see. Well, what was the name of this noble soul?"

"Sir Aravis, was his name." Cylaria said.

"My word!" Exclaimed the Knight, and dropped to a knee in front of her again.

"My lady carries the favour of the First of Lolins Knights! I spoke last

night that I was in your service, and now I do affirm that. Should you require

anything, know this vow, your safety and health I will defend, your honour I

will protect and your command I will perform. Until Lolin returns, I swear

this."


Taken aback, Cylaria looked puzzled, but quickly understood. "Your vow is

accepted Sir, and you have my deepest thanks" With that Sir Trebassin smiled

and returned to his feet, now seeming a little taller and straighter to

Cylaria.


"Would my Lady now care for a lesson in the noble art of swordplay?" he asked.

"Very much so," Cylaria replied, smiling and eager.


As the day drew on into the afternoon they played, fighting for hours, resting

whenever the other tired and enjoying the sun. Trebassin was by far the

superior, after all, he had years of experience and training to Cylarias few

lessons from Sir Aravis. Nonetheless the fights were keen and hard-fought. The

armour Cylaria had been given by Trebassin rang less often than that of the

guards that had practised before, and every now and then a telling blow fell

upon the helm or breastplate of the Knight. As passersby approached and

marvelled at the speed and grace of the two combatants, words of encouragement

were shouted to both, mostly to Cylaria, obviously the underdog, and some to

Trebassin in merry jest.


As they rested, the sun having begun its journey from the sky to the hills, a

sudden commotion was heard from around the corner. Harsh words and shouting

and the sound of a scuffle.


Trebassin jumped to his feet and moved quickly around the corner. Cylaria

followed behind. As they come into view the dark stranger that had been in the

hall last night delivered a final back-hand slap to the girl he had in his

grasp, letting her fall to the ground.


"HOLD!" The echoing boom of a command came from Trebassin, his sword

unsheathed and his face stern. Those that heard froze, and looked up from

their toil. The dark man however sneered and moved away from the girl now

lying in the dust. Trebassin moved to intercept him as the stranger moved to

go past but before they met, the dark one pulled a long curved dagger from a

sheath hidden within the folds of his clothing.


Thrusting forwards at the Knight, the mans knife flashed an inch from

Trebassins face as he deftly, but only just avoided the murderous cut.

Slamming the hilt of his sword into the midriff of the stranger as he dodged a

muffled gasp was heard as the strangers wind escaped him and he crumpled to

the ground, gasping to breath. Kicking away the knife from where it had fallen

with his clean white boot Sir Trebassin looked towards the girl that was

struck. She had recovered her feet and was sobbing in the arms of another, but

a trickle of blood could be seen coming from the corner of her mouth, and a

deep cut had opened on her cheek. Bending down Trebassin grasped the hand that

had struck the girl and examined it, A ring on the middle finger told the

tale, and he let the hand fall.


"Do you know why this man assaulted you my lady?" asked the Knight, keeping a

stern eye on the prone figure at his feet.

"Mmf" was the response, with a hurried shake of the head, clearly indicating a

complete lack of understanding on the part of the girl.

"Then this was an unprovoked attack?" The question was rhetorical, yet the

~
899356305
A Knight's Story - Part IV - continued~
Cylaria~
girl nodded, before she was led to a bench to sit down.


Meanwhile the figure on the ground took air, and began breathing more

regularly. He looked up, and saw the tip of the sword and a very small cross

section of it as it hovered in the air at him.

"Rise!" commanded the Knight, "and know Lolins justice."


The stranger struggled to his feet, his face angry and his eyes flashing.

"The girl was willing." He sneered.

"Not now it seems," replied Trebassin, his sword not wavering an inch, "and

innocence always has the choice."

A mumbled curse came from the lips of the stranger, something best not

described in mixed company, and his eyes flashed. He turned away from the

sword and moved to leave.

"Hold!" repeated the Knight, but was ignored, and Trebassin placed a heavy

gauntlet on the shoulder of the villain.

"Away!" shouted the man, shrugging him off and whirling, producing another

dagger from his belt. Slashing up at Trebassin outstretched arm, the knife

bit, stabbing through the padding and producing a yell from the Knight.

"In Lolins Name!" he yelled, slashing down with the sword, the weapon only

being dodged by the merest fractions. The villain fell back, and rolled,

coming to his feet near the knife he had first held, reaching low he picked it

up, his intent clear.

Cylaria rushed to Trebassins side, her sword out and ready.

"No!" He cried, "Stand back, this is my fight, single combat!"


Darting forward they both clashed, Trebassin parrying the long dagger

masterfully the whirling away, striking quickly at the mans chest. That blow

to was dodged, but the next was better placed. Unable to recover his balance

quickly enough, the stranger whirled to see his end, Trebassins sword passed

through the cloth of his garb and into his intestines with ease, the blood

gushed and the stranger screamed, his face suddenly ashen. With drawing the

blood-darkened blade, Trebassin took a step back, readying the final strike,

but before it could come, the stranger pointed to the sky and cursed. A beam

of fiery energy leapt from his fingers and coursed upwards.


Whack! The blow passed easily through his neck, slicing and separating the

strangers head from his body. The decapitated corpse crumpled again to the

rapidly reddening earth and the head skittered away, ending up against a cart

wheel, some distance from the body.


A stunned silence, as most gazed at the scene of gore now before them, but

Trebassins and Cylarias eyes looked at just one thing, the line of fire

still hanging in the air, and leaping off into the distance.


To be continued

~
899356540
The Moral of the Story is...~
Jaime~
A long time ago, there was a magical land known as Tridia.  Happy little

critters called Trids lived there.  But one day, a mean old ogre came in

to Tridia and stole the most fertile land there was.  The ogre managed to

conquer the land and scare away any Trid army that wanted to try and

recapture the land.

Then a Rabbi of The Goddes Bobette, the goddes of helping little things

that are being beaten by Bigger things, came to the land of Tridia.  The

Rabbi spoke with the Trids, and looked around, and noticed that the Trids

did not go near the most fertile land in Tridia.  He asked them why, and

they related the story of the mean ogre taking over that spot.  The Rabbi

managed to organize a Trid task force to drive the ogre out and retake

the land.  When they all got near the land the ogre occupied, the ogre

ran out and began kicking the Trids miles away.  All the Trids were

kicked away, but they came back.  But, the big ogre never kicked the

Rabbi.  The Trids walked back, and were kicked back a few more times,

until the Rabbi walked up to the ogre and asked :" Why don't you kick

me?Stop kicking the Trids and pick on someone your own size!" 

The ogre gave the Rabbi a quizical look, and then replied (after kicking

more Trids) " Silly Rabbi, kicks are for Trids!"

~
899583174
Elienne and Arlec Tera'tarlen.~
Arlec~
@nThe story of Arlec and Elienne Tera'tarlen.

Once long ago in ages past, well before your time, there lived two great

mages of the llewyrr, Mirimale and Siomon Tera'tarlen.  Mirimale was one

of the most beautiful llewyrr in the Vaasa and many a young heart was

besoted with her apearance.  Siomon Tera'tarlen was a noble of no great

standing, however his power as an earth mage and wisdom beyond his years

had earned him a high standing with the elders.  Both Siomon and Mirimale

where the leaders of the Magus of the shuvanaguard, very ancient and

dignified positions.  Mirimale and Siomon where both very much in love

with each other and after many years Mirimale gave birth to twins, one

boy and one girl.

.

Now as is known twins are a very rare thing for llewyrr and the birth of

these twins was considered an omen of some importance at that time.  For,

as the children of two such powerful mages they where sure to be embued

with a natural affinity for magic.  The girl child was named Elienne, she

had definitely inherited her features from Mirimale, a delicate beauty

even at birth.  The boy was known as Arlec, his head adorned with a thick

mat of black hair, he oddly sported a pure white streak through his fuzzy

fringe.  It was obvious to all who saw them that these where two very

special llewyrr.

.

While the twins where still only babes a great war befell the land. 

Greedy humans from Medienne, Intent on clearing the Medienne forest for

pastural land set about forcing the llewyrr deeper into the Vaasa.  For,

as it is told, once apon a time the Vaasa extended far beyond its current

bounds, encompassing Medienne forest in its entirety.  Now Mirimale and

Siomon, as leaders of the Magus of the Shuvanaguard where called to

battle against this human threat, forcing them to leave their beloved

newborn twins to the care of Mirimale's parents in a remote town in 

the Vaasa.

Knowing of the dangers of magic for the untrained, Mirimale and Siomon

cast a great enchantment on their children, locking their powers within

the Tera'tarlen family crest, which was set into two halves of a silver

amulet, One piece was hung around the neck of each of the twins in this

way protecting them from harm until their parents returned from the

battle.  The wars between the humans raged on for many a year, leaving

little opertunity for the twins to see their parents.  Several summers

passed just as the leaves where beginning to fall tragedy struck.

.

Mirimale and Siomon, no longer able to stand the time away from their

beloved babies ventured from the battlefield to the small village to meet

with their children.  Unknown to them as they travelled through the

forests together a small raiding party of humans had found their trail. 

. Mirimale and Siomon reached the village just before dinnertime, the

smells of fresh cooking hung heavily in the air.  They where greeted

openly and with love by their relatives as they lovingly embraced their

now toddler aged children.  They sat around the large fire in the small

cottage, Siomon with Elienne snuggled in his lap fast asleep and Mirimale

making small balls of Many-coloured lights which kept Arlec in a constant

state of giggling.  The twins proud Grandparents sitting together on the

corner, content knowing their family was safe and happy.

.

Meanwhile, not far away, the humans where beginning to work out that the

two llewyrr they had been following where both of great importance to the

llewyrrn army.  That night, under the cover of darkness the raiders crept

towards the village, surrounding it slowly until near dawn they struck. 

Screaming barbaric battle cries the human army swept into the village,

killing the llewyrrn children their beds and brutally slaying their

parents as they tried to save their children.

.

Awoken by the screams of death Mirimale and Siomon desperately began

fighting back against the humans.  Casting great enchantment's the two

fought side by side taking out many foe.  Alas, no matter how many

Mirimale and Siomon slew there always seemed more.  Mirimale called down

lighting and great maelstroms against the humans while Siomon surrounded

the cottage with great shields of protection.  As the battle drew on the

two mages began to grow weary, and in a moment of near total exhaustion

Siomon's guards slipped, allowing one single stray arrow to find its

mark, deep within his chest.  Slumping to the ground Siomon cast one

final enchantment, utterly destroying the enemies' archers.  Mirimale,

tears pouring from her eyes kneeled down beside her dying husband,

holding him in her arms With his last breath Siomon told Mirimale to save

the twins and to escape.  Gently letting his body to rest on the ground,

Minimal watched as the last trace of the earth magic Siomon had commanded

turned his body to light which slowly settled into the earth.

.

Leaping to her feet Mirimale backed into the cottage, defending against

the human onslaught with her ever waning strength.  As she entered her

children's bedroom a terrible site unfolded before her.  The twins where

huddled crying in their cot as their Grandfather, a once proud warrior

fought to defend his grandchildren, his loving wife lying dead at his

feet.  Mirimale took Arlec in her arms and motioned for her father to

take Elienne.  With great effort Mirimale opened a portal leading to the

Temple in the Tree city of the Vaasa.  The twins Grandfather entered the

portal with Elienne crying in his arms, as the last person through had to

be the caster to close the portal.

.

With a great surge the human raiders surged into the room brandishing

cold steel.  With an adept slash a human sword landed a cruel blow to

Mirimale's side, opening up a massive wound.  As the blow landed Mirimale

lost her grip on the portal, slamming it closed forever.  Protecting

Arlec with her body Mirimale cried out a final desperate prayer to

Dawnstar, beseeching her to save her son.  With a blinding flash of light

Mirimales prayer was answered and Arlec disappeared as the final blow

took Mirimales life.

WORK IN PROGRESS.

~
899749249
Legacies~
Aeneas~
I opened my eyes. Darkness greeted me serenely as I slowly stood to my

feet. As I glanced about, I could find nothing, only the Darkness. My

mind recalled my last memory. The Gods, cupping the world in their gentle

hands, had purged it of all uncleanliness. In due time, too, for the

events that had occured in the last world were reaching a crescendo that

could not be deterred.

  I stood in this Darkness, wondering what was my fate. Shunned by

Algesa for my failure, and frowned upon by Morr for my weakness, I found

myself standing at the crossroads of my afterlife.  It was then that he

spoke.

  "Aeneas, you have failed me," his voice rang out through my mind. He

did not even deign to bless me with his presence.  Bowing my head, I

listened on.

  "But you have been a valued servant, and I release you from your

bondage," he said.  I raised my head, wondering what his intentions were. 

"Your mortality shall be restored, though your soul has been tainted by my

touch.  You can never be human again." I looked down at my hands.  Once a

healthy tan, my skin was now a wan, pale shade of white.  Loosening my

hair, which was once a deep ebony, I found that it was now ash gray.  I

clenched my fists, but listened further.

  "I have taken my power from you. You have been a worthy vessel, but

your time has past.  There is another who shall go in your stead." My

mind instantly went to my beloved, Lorah Du Soth, the shining beacon in

my otherwise bleak life.  But she was different, somehow....tainted.  A

tear streamed from my eye as Morr continued.

  "Go forth, into the underworld, where you belong, Du Soth. Guard my

champion well...she is new to the Darkness in her heart." Then I knew. 

Screaming in agony, I cried as I witnessed what had - no, will, come to

pass.

~
900017805
This week's recipe - Troll Pie~
Kierthos~
Yet another recipe from the files of "Sentients for Supper"


Ingredients:

------------


One lb.  ground troll (may use hamburger if troll unwilling) 

One-half (1/2) cup chopped onion

One can cut green beans, drained

One can condensed cream of tomato soup

Four servings mashed potatoes

One and one-fourth (1-1/4) cups grated cheese


Directions:

-----------


Brown meat and onions until meat is cooked and onions are tender.  Drain

fat.  Stir in green beans and soup.  Heat through.  Pour into lightly

greased baking dish.  Top with mashed potatoes.  Bake at 350 degress for

25 minutes.  Sprinkle grated cheese over top, and bake 10 minutes longer,

or until cheese is melted and pie is bubbly.


Makes 2-4 servings.

Next week's recipe: Shepherd pie (with real shepherds!)

~
900139858
From "The Common Soldier's Song"~
Kierthos~
When Emperors clash and squabble and fight,

Who carries the weight of their swords?

When kings mock each other and threaten for spite,

Who puts hardened metal to words?


Whenever trouble brews in the borderlands far,

What manner of beast is sent o'er,

To laugh at the dragon and sup on the b'ar,

While scribing their names into lore?


The soldier no more and the soldier no less,

They bear the whole earth 'neath their feet.

If ever you want heroes some wrong to redress,

No likely sort you'll meet.

~
900311654
The Wind that Shakes the Barley~
Fingolfin~
I sat within the valley green

I sat me with my true love.

My sad heart strove the two between

The old love and the new love.

The old for her the new

That made me think of Vaasa dearly.

While the soft wind blew down the glade

and shook the golden barley.


T'was hard the woeful words to frame

To break the ties that bound us.

But harder still to bear the shame

of foreign chains around us.

And so I said the mountain pass

I'll meet at morning early.

And I'll join the bold united ones

While soft winds shook the barley.


T'was sad I kissed away her tears

My fond arm round her flinging.

When a foeman's shot hissed on our ears

From out the wild woods ringing.

An arrow pierced my true love's side

In life's young spring so early.

And on my breast in blood she died

While soft winds shook the barley.


But blood for blood without remorse

I've ta'en at oulart hollow.

I've lain my true love's clay like corpse

Where I full soon must follow.

Around her grave I've wandered drear

Noon, night, and morning early.

With breaking heart when e'er I hear

The wind that shakes the barley.

~
900346562
Of Beginnings...~
Soiren~
I stood before the altar to His Darkness, the Eternal Lord Morr. The

High Priest stood before me, reciting the traditional passage in the Dark

Canon, which was read before any and every knight was inducted into the

Order.

  As the priest went on, my mind drifted slowly into the past. I had

to wield a sword in the name of a just cause from the time I could lift

one; my brother would look on in amusement as I practiced my skill. 

Indeed, he looked on in amusement, for I always found him buried in his

tomes, forever praying to an unknown diety for aid.

  I loved my brother. Though we had different interests, it was

always comforting to have his encouraging presence around when I

participated in junior tourneys as a youth.  Yes, I did love him dearly.

  But as time went along, I noticed that he began to change. His study

periods began to increase dramatically, and we never got a chance to

spend any time together.  I became discouraged, and my skills began to

falter.  I felt as if he had left me behind, and that affected my

training.  At this point, no decent order would accept me in this

condition.

  But one night, I had a dream. My brother came to me in this dream,

speaking words of encouragement in my ear.  "Never fail, the power is

yours, and only yours," he said.  Then he was gone.  When I woke, I felt

strengthened.  I looked for my brother to tell him what had happened. 

But he had gone.

  For the next several years, I poured the whole of my heart into

my training, and discovering what had happened to my brother.  As I grew

stronger, I learned more of what had befallen my brother.  Rumor held it

that he was indentured to the Morr the Eternal, God of Death.  My heart

was torn as I heard this.  That my brother could affiliate himself with

so vile a being wrenched my soul.

  My purpose shifted subtly at this point. I worked twice as hard,

hoping to become a valiant knight, and perhaps that would sway my brother

from his evil ways.  Perhaps.

  My sixteenth birthday arrived. I had not seen my brother in four

years, and my heart longed for him.  It was then that I heard rumor of

his fate: He had faded away into nothingness, his duty served to Morr,

and his time done.  I cried that night as I had never cried before.  As

my tears slowly put me to sleep, I had another dream.  A dark man, full

of malignant power, approached me.  Without a word, he placed his hand on

my brow.  A pulse of darkness flowed through his hand into my body.

  At this, I woke. But I was different, I could tell. Sadness for my

brother was replaced by anger.  Determined, I fled my home that night

forever, never to return.  I sought out the cause of my brother's death,

and was determined to put an end to it.  With subtlety, I enlisted in

Morr's dark order.  It was my intent to gain power within the Order,

then, at the peak of my strength, denounce Morr in the name of my brother.

  For two years I was an initiate in the Order, my purpose always locked

within a corner of my mind, always remembered.  Now, on my eighteenth

birthday, my time was at hand.  I was ready to join the Order.  It was to

my suspicion why my dark intent had not been revealed by the

acolytes...perhaps in it's justness, it was hidden from those with the

  "D'hreszant," the High Priest called. At the sound of my name, I

looked up.  Before him, the priest held the ceremonial blade that was

given to every knight upon his induction.  My heart raced with excitment

as he turned the blade and handed it to me, hilt first.  Trembling, I

took the blade in my hand.  The pommel was simple, but the hilt and the

blade itself took my breath away.  The hilt was made of a black steel,

and the blade was the same.  With sharpness, I saluted as the priest

recited Morr's blessing over me.  I could not help but smile....this was

yet the beginning.

~
900368924
Medienne~
Talis~
You who have come seeking tales, seeking the buried lore of the past and

the wisdom it caries, it is you I call upon now.  Come.  Bear witness to

a time of evil barely averted and a time of death.  A time of war long

gone.  Gaze deep into the fire before us.  It is the sacred fire of the

weaver of tales and in it are the images you will come to know.  Smell

deep of the woodsmoke as the fire consumes its fuel and remember a time

long gone when an entire world seemed buried in that stench.  Hear in the

crackling of the flames the rattle of spear and sword wielded in combat. 

The hissing steam recalls the fading wails of the damned and the bereaved

left to nurse wounds that would, in the end, never fully heal.  Gaze deep

and fall into an age gone by.


@g- - - - -@n


The crackling fire of the tavern was strangely remeniscent of the warm

hearth that had once glowed within, only now it was all that remained of

the funeral pyre that marked the tavern's passage from useful structure

to useless charred wood.  The silver crown that had been the tavern's

namesake lay before the skeletal remains of its front doors, unharmed

except for a crack that ran solidly through it maring its surface.  Aiden

reached down and retrieved the silver crown from the street.  A true

shame, he thought, this had been his favorite tavern.


As Aiden looked around he was hard pressed to find some sign in this

war-ravaged town that things just might turn out ok, that there was still

hope.  Medienne had once been a beautiful city.  The crowning glory of

human civilization, at least in this land.  Now, even the beautiful

stones quarried far off in the distant Cairn mountains were cracked and

charred by the heat of so many burning buildings.  The heavy scent of

woodsmoke choked the air and everything was coated in a layer of ash. 

Then Aiden found it, his small glimmer of hope.  A child, no more than

six, playing in the detritus of the street.  A small doll as besmirched

in soot as she was, yet she didn't seem to notice the devastation around

her as she took delight in the simple act of living and playing.


Aiden didn't know who's child she was and odds were he would never find

out.  Now wasn't the time, but thanks be to Taranth for the blessing of

this sight.  The simple happiness of a child untouched right now by the

fury of those bedeviled elves.  Medienne would rebuild, slowly, despite

the ongoing war and despite the fact things were going more than just

poorly.  Perhaps some day it would be restored to its former glory but by

then it will have fallen to the children to rebuild the mighty city.  For

them to have any chance at all it fell now to him to defend them first. 

By Kerog, he wouldn't let another child die to the atrocities wrought by

the elves.  Granted it was true he had never seen an elf strike down a

child, in fact he had seen them turn aside their blades when children

stood in the way, but what difference if the child died beneath the

burning timbers of a collapsing building?  The elves would pay for the

deaths of every child, woman and man who died in this acursed war or he

would die trying to avenge them.  Hopefully both.


Yes, Aiden thought, the war between the humans and the elves had only

started in earnest about two months ago and already an entire section of

Medienne lay in utter ruins.  Things looked mighty grim, but life

persists in spite of all that would hold it back and so would he.  Aiden

looked breifly at the shining silver of the cracked crown in his hands

once again then tucked it safely away in his pack.  He wasn't sure really

why he saved it thus.  He didn't have a place to stay, and his few

remains took up most of the space in his pack.  Certainly the silver

wasn't worth much right now.  What people needed was good iron and steel

for weapons, not soft, maleable metals like gold and silver.  Whatever

the reason, it eluded him now and he merely accepted it like so many

other things he had had to accept of late.  He cinched the straps on his

pack and moved westward, away from the worst of the devastation.  Word

was being spread that one of the villas on the west side of town was

being used as an impromptu militia hall by Lord Daniel.  Anyone who was

able was to report in for duty, either to rebuild or prepare to repell

the next onslought.  Aiden planned on being there the next time the elves

attacked and this time things would go differently.  He vowed this to

himself out loud now, even if in his heart only cold dread resided, then

he moved on.


@g- - - - -@n


(To be continued in the next posting)

~
900399990
True Story~
Belgar~
The priestess looked out over the scene in horror.  The sacred altar to

Taranth was being defiled, and the guardians of the temple were standing

by as if nothing was happening.  The mossy slab of stone that had served

the temple for many a year was covered in blood and entrails, red

dripping through the darker patches where it had dried.  Bones were

scattered like leaves across the grassy cobblestones, the green dying off. 

As she watched, a human entered the temple grounds, heading straight for

the altar.  Shaking a sack, the 'paladin' emptied the carcasses of hacked

up animals onto the path, flies buzzing around the corpses as they stank

in the heat.  First one, then another, he selected the corpses, placed

them on the altar of Mercy, and impaled them with a blade, calling now to

Kerog, now to Algesa, now to Meriadia.  The corpses faded, as the

sacrifices were accepted.  The priestess stared in disbelief.


Next to the scene, waiting near the square as if in line to buy an ale,

was a llewyrr, noble-enough looking, a mage from the looks of him.  The

priestess squinted, trying to see what he was dragging.  As the elf

walked to the altar, she recognised, her gorge rising.  It was Martin,

the town drunk.  He was burned and maimed, blood spurting from knife

wounds across his chest, and half his face blown away by flame.  Faint

moans came from the figure.  The elf dragged the dying corpse of the

drunk onto the altar, and raised his blade.  'To Taranth...' 

~
900423491
"In The Beginning"~
Elwin~
Once, long ago fairies lived on this earth.  And if the old tails of King

Aurthr Pendragon's Camelot are true they were the defenders and the

protectors of the mortal humans.


In time some even married these humans and they gave birth to a new race

of creatures.  The fairies called these beings elves.  Each time an elvin

child was born the fairies took it into the forest away from all harm. 

There they grew and became something great.


But even so the elves had to remain hidden for all humans because they

things bad for them not better, so it was buy there choise that elvse

would remain a secret to humans for as long as they could....


But with only nature as there allie and the forest as there home it was

not easy to live in solitude for very long.  Many elves got curious and

began to leave there forest home and interact with other races but with

leaving the forest the elves discovered many new wonders but also many

untold dangers...


It took many wars and many lost friends but finally the elves learned to

live with humans and some other cultures in realitive peace and harmony,

but still there are awalys some races, Goblinds,Orcs the elves closest

brother the Vyans that would awalys give elves and the other light races

alost of trouble.


But with all the wars and battles in the end it was worth it all.  Now

many races share cities and villages with other races and togeather they

will learn from each other and help each other until one day all of the

races, light and dark will become one and everyone will be prosperous and

happy for the rest of there days....


PS:This is my first note on the stories board so i would aprecate it if

somone gave me there honest opinion on it.

+-----{------------------------ Elwin -------------------------}------+


@yI suggest formatting your note or noone will read it.  I've done it for

you on this one.  --Fenlyn@n 

Thanks Fenlyn ill rember that for next time.   --Elwin

~
900445208
From the Journals - The Duel~
Ellania~
@I@IAfter clearing out the latest troglodyte infestation and sending

their vyan puppetmaster to its final destination, I set off for home.

@I@II sold most of the equipment claimed during my raid, and sacrificed

the rest to Dawnstar.  Completing my prayers at her altar, I decided a

visit to the fishing village would be in order.

@I@ISome time later, I paused at the entrance to the village, sitting and

resting on the ground, relaxing after my patrol.  The village was quiet,

as it is so often these days.  The incursions from the dark races grow

less and less frequent, although the size of their raiding parties grow

larger.  It matters not, though, as they scatter just as quickly before

the Guard regardless of their size.

@I@IAfter a short time, I was joined by Arlec Tera'tarlen, who wore a

look of grim determination.  He explained that he was here to fight a

duel with the dwarven warrior Dorian.  This foul-mouthed creature has

often spoken ill of llewyrr, but apparently he recently extended his

insulting behavior to Arlec's mate.  I didn't ask Arlec for any of the

details of how it happened, but it had evidently become a matter of

honor, and a time and place was agreed upon for them to settle the matter.

@I@II offered to guard the entrance to the village when the time came,

and Arlec graciously accepted.  He built a small fire to warm us while we

discussed battle tactics.  After waiting for quite some time, the

conversation turned to other matters.  We were about to give up on Dorian. 

We knew he had been in the Dragonspire mountains with a yeti-hunting

party earlier that day.  Perhaps something had happened, or some other

urgent situation was causing a delay?  But no, just then a messenger

arrived, saying that Dorian was very sorry, but that he would be unable

to make it.

@I@IArlec and I looked at each other for a few seconds before bursting

out in raucous laughter.  Dorian may have denied Arlec the pleasure of

besting him in a fair duel, but by forfeiting altogether, the end result

was the same.  The name Tera'tarlen remains an honorable one.

@I@IThe time had come for me to go, but Arlec decided to remain for a

time, in case Dorian's courage returned later.  I wonder what happened?

~
900513104
Medienne, 2~
Talis~
@g- - - - -@n


When Aiden arived at the villa he estimated its appearance as less than

impressive at best.  One outer wall was completely black with ashe and

soot, all that remained of the villa's neighbor, and the rest of the

walls fared little better.  Despite the singed appearance, the building

remained a sturdy testament to humankind's will to resist and continue on. 

Around it at least a score of people milled in small groups their voices

buzzing excitedly.


"Hail friends, what news have you?" Aiden asked of one of the smaller

fringe groups seeking what information he could gather on short notice.


"Lord Daniel has sent word off to the dwarves requesting aid, perhaps

weapons or even warriors." answered a man clad in leather armor easily

too large for him.  These days people took what protection they could and

scrounged where they needed.  Wherever his armor came from, it was

obviously not his to begin with.

"There's hope for us yet!" answered the leather clad man's friend

optimistically.  And perhaps he's right, Aiden thought to himself.  With

the aid of the dwarves, if they could be reached in time, the odds were

stacked against the elves rather than for them.


After a moment of companionable banter Aiden bid his companions fare well

and moved on in search of more news.  It seemed everyone was focused on

this new hope, though it felt more like grasping at straws to him.  Or

maybe it was just his own dark forboding that cast a shadow over this

hope for him.  If he hadn't been oway during the first attack, if he had

been here where he belonged....  No, Aiden decided, he wouldn't think

about that again, not now when there was work to be done.


A few more questions at the villa brought him the answer he sought.

Lord Daniel was enlisting the aid of any capable people willing to fight on behalf of Medienne.

For those who could not fight, yet lacked not in spirit, there was ample work to be done in and around town as well.

Fortifications were being erected again, new walls built.


Many years before the entire town had been walled against potential

invasion by lizardfolk from the swamps to the south and the general

hazards of the woodlands.  As Medienne had grown it seemed to push back

the woods and the animals had shyed away and the lizardfolk invasions

never came to be.  Medienne had long since overgrown the walls that once

protected it and only fragments remained to mark where they once stood

testament to a village's solid defences.


There was need for warriors and healers in the time to come.  Those

skilled in even the least of magics would be needed to help repell the

magics of the elves when they next invaded.  Smiths and tanners would be

busy for a time to come as wood carpenters and masons.  In any other time

there would be much coin to be made but now the coin of the realm was

food and resources.  Barter was fast overtaking the use of coinage as

gold and gems fell aside untraded, inedible and useless for tools.


Those willing to work or fight would be paid out of Lord Daniel's stores

of food and shelter would be provided, neither of which anyone could

afford to forego these days.  The tax that had always existed on the

goods coming and going through the town was well spent now, purchasing

good will of aid and affording the work born of necessity and war.


Aiden considered his rapidly dwindling supplies, all that remained of a

home and a business burned in one of the latest elven raids when he was

out of town, and knew his decision was already made.  Having lost

everything but what he carried and refusing to leave his town again he

was only left with a few remaining skills that would be of use.  He own

two hands, his strength and years of hunting and training with spear and

knife.  It wasn't long before Aiden had signed up as one of the town's

warrior-defenders.  For the night he was given shelter in a nearby villa

that was being converted into a barracks for for the many others in his

same situation.  Homeless but unwilling to leave and chance the dangers

of the wilds.  Some strong of heart and faith, others simply unwilling to

be pushed any farther.  In the days to come all of them would have their

mettle tested, but for tonight they slept only fitfully awaiting what


tomorrow would bring.

@g- - - - -@n

~
900565903
$~
